Vermont, session 2025-2026, H138.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. chapter 189 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 189. TORT CLAIMS AGAINST THE STATE OR A
MUNICIPALITY
§ 5601. LIABILITY OF STATE OR A MUNICIPALITY
(a) The State of Vermont or a municipality shall be liable for injury to
persons or property or loss of life caused by the negligent or wrongful act or
VT LEG #379908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.138
2025 Page 2 of 5
omission of an employee of the State or a municipality while acting within the
scope of employment, under the same circumstances, in the same manner, and
to the same extent as a private person would be liable to the claimant except
that the claimant shall not have the right to levy execution on any property of
the State to satisfy any judgment. The Superior Courts of the State shall have
exclusive jurisdiction of any actions brought hereunder under this chapter.
(b) Effective July 1, 2011, the The maximum liability of the State or a
municipality under this section shall be $500,000.00 to any one person and the
maximum aggregate liability shall be $2,000,000.00 to all persons arising out
of each occurrence.
(c) If the claimant is not a resident of the State of Vermont, the claimant
may bring suit in any Superior Court. The agent for the service of process on
the State shall be the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s duly
authorized representative.
(d) This chapter does not allow any insurance carrier to bring action or
recover against the State or a municipality for any payments made as a result
of any private insurance contract between the carrier and a State or municipal
employee.
(e) This section shall not apply to:
(1) Any claim based upon an act or omission of an employee of the
State or a municipality exercising due care, in the execution of a statute or
VT LEG #379908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.138
2025 Page 3 of 5
regulation, whether or not such the statute or regulation is valid, or based upon
the exercise or performance or failure to exercise or perform a discretionary
function or duty on the part of a State agency or municipality or an employee
of the State or a municipality, whether or not the discretion involved is abused.
* * *
(3) Any claim for damages caused by the impositions of a quarantine by
the State or municipality.
(4) Any claim for damages caused by the fiscal operations of any State
or municipal officer or department.
* * *
(f) The limitations in subsection (e) of this section do not apply to claims
against the State of Vermont or a municipality to the extent that there exists
coverage under a policy of liability insurance purchased by the Secretary of
Administration or municipality.
* * *
§ 5602. EXCLUSIVE RIGHT OF ACTION
* * *
(c) As used in this chapter, “employee” means any person a “State
employee” as defined as a State employee by in 3 V.S.A. § 1101 or a
“municipal employee” as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 901a.
* * *
VT LEG #379908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.138
2025 Page 4 of 5
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. chapter 33, subchapter 4 is amended to read:
Subchapter 4. Actions by or Against Officers; Liability; Penalties
§ 901. ACTIONS BY OR AGAINST TOWN MUNICIPAL OFFICERS
(a) Where an action is given to any appointed or elected municipal officer
or town school district officer, the action shall be brought in the name of the
town municipality in which the officer serves and in the case of a town school
district officer in the name of the town school district. If the action is given
against such the municipal or school district officers, it shall be brought against
such town the municipality or town school district, as the case may be.
(b) The municipality shall assume all reasonable legal fees incurred by an
officer when the officer was acting in the performance of his or her the
officer’s duties and did not act with any malicious intent.
(c) The maximum liability of a municipality under this section shall be the
maximum liability established pursuant to 12 V.S.A. § 5601.
§ 901a. TORT CLAIMS AGAINST MUNICIPAL EMPLOYEES
* * *
(g) The maximum liability of a municipality under this section shall be the
maximum liability established pursuant to 12 V.S.A. § 5601.
VT LEG #379908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.138
2025 Page 5 of 5
§ 902. PENALTY
Unless otherwise provided, a town municipal officer who fails or neglects
to perform a duty imposed upon him or her the officer by law shall be fined not
more than $100.00.
§ 903. NONLIABILITY OF MUNICIPAL OFFICERS FOR MONEY PAID
OUT
An action shall not be maintained against a person for money paid out by
him or her the person as an officer of a municipal corporation municipality in
accordance with a vote of such corporation the municipality, whether such vote
was valid or not.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379908 v.1